Hawaii statutes.
§152-3 Prohibited acts. It shall be
unlawful to introduce or to transport specific noxious weeds or their seeds or
vegetative reproductive parts into any area designated pursuant to section
152-5 as free or reasonably free of those noxious weeds; provided that the
introduction or transportation of those noxious weeds may be permitted for
educational or research purposes when authorized by a permit issued by the
department. [L 1975, c 44, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 92, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next